Idaho, session 2026, H0589.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3024, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3024. INDIVIDUALS' TAX AND TAX ON ESTATES AND TRUSTS. (1) For each
taxable year, a tax measured by Idaho taxable income as defined in this chap-
ter is hereby imposed upon every individual, trust, or estate required by
this chapter to file a return.
(2)(a) The tax imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates shall be
computed at the rate of five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) five and
six hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (5.695%) of taxable income
over two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(b) For taxpayers filing a joint return pursuant to the provisions
of section 63-3031, Idaho Code, the tax imposed shall be computed at
the rate of five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) five and six hundred
ninety-five thousandths percent (5.695%) of taxable income over five
thousand dollars ($5,000). For the purposes of this section, a return
of a surviving spouse, as defined in section 2(a) of the Internal Rev-
enue Code, and a head of household, as defined in section 2(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code, shall be treated as a joint return.
(3) For taxable year 2000 and each year thereafter, the state tax com-
mission shall prescribe a factor that shall be used to compute the Idaho in-
come tax thresholds provided in subsection (2) of this section. The factor
shall provide an adjustment to the Idaho tax thresholds so that inflation
will not result in a tax increase. The Idaho tax thresholds shall be adjusted
as follows: multiply the last threshold amount by the percentage (the con-
sumer price index for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year to which the adjusted threshold amount will apply divided by the con-
sumer price index for calendar year 1998). For the purpose of this computa-


tion, the consumer price index for any calendar year is the average of the
consumer price index as of the close of the twelve (12) month period for the
immediately preceding calendar year, without regard to any subsequent ad-
justments, as adopted by the state tax commission. This adoption shall be
exempt from the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The consumer
price index shall mean the consumer price index for all U.S. urban consumers
published by the United States department of labor. The state tax commission
shall annually include the factor as provided in this subsection to multiply
against Idaho taxable income using the thresholds in this section to arrive
at that year's Idaho taxable income for tax threshold purposes.
(4) In the case of a trust that is an electing small business trust as
defined in section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code, the special rules for
taxation of such trusts contained in section 641 of the Internal Revenue Code
shall apply, except that the individual rate provided in subsection (2)(a)
of this section shall apply in computing tax due under this chapter.
(5) The state tax commission may promulgate rules defining the condi-
tions upon which such returns shall be filed.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-3024, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 30, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3024, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3024. INDIVIDUALS' TAX AND TAX ON ESTATES AND TRUSTS. (1) For each
taxable year, a tax measured by Idaho taxable income as defined in this chap-
ter is hereby imposed on every individual, trust, or estate required by this
chapter to file a return.
(2)(a) The tax imposed on individuals, trusts, and estates shall be
computed at the rate of five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) of taxable
income over two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
(b) For taxpayers filing a joint return pursuant to the provisions of
section 63-3031, Idaho Code, the tax imposed shall be computed at the
rate of five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) of taxable income over five
thousand dollars ($5,000). For the purposes of this section, a return
of a surviving spouse, as defined in section 2(a) of the Internal Rev-
enue Code, and a head of household, as defined in section 2(b) of the In-
ternal Revenue Code, shall be treated as a joint return.
(3) For taxable year 2000 and each year thereafter, the state tax com-
mission shall prescribe a factor that shall be used to compute the Idaho in-
come tax thresholds provided in subsection (2) of this section. The factor
shall provide an adjustment to the Idaho tax thresholds so that inflation
will not result in a tax increase. The Idaho tax thresholds shall be adjusted
as follows: multiply the last threshold amount by the percentage (the con-
sumer price index for the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar
year to which the adjusted threshold amount will apply divided by the con-
sumer price index for calendar year 1998). For the purpose of this computa-
tion, the consumer price index for any calendar year is the average of the
consumer price index as of the close of the twelve (12) month period for the
immediately preceding calendar year, without regard to any subsequent ad-


justments, as adopted by the state tax commission. This adoption shall be
exempt from the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code. The consumer
price index shall mean the consumer price index for all U.S. urban consumers
published by the United States department of labor. The state tax commission
shall annually include the factor as provided in this subsection to multiply
against Idaho taxable income using the thresholds in this section to arrive
at that year's Idaho taxable income for tax threshold purposes.
(4) In the case of a trust that is an electing small business trust as
defined in section 1361 of the Internal Revenue Code, the special rules for
taxation of such trusts contained in section 641 of the Internal Revenue Code
shall apply, except that the individual rate provided in subsection (2)(a)
of this section shall apply in computing tax due under this chapter.
(5) The state tax commission may promulgate rules defining the condi-
tions upon which such returns shall be filed.
SECTION 4. That Section 63-3025, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3025. TAX ON CORPORATE INCOME. (1) For each taxable year, a tax is
hereby imposed on the Idaho taxable income of a corporation, other than an
S corporation, that transacts or is authorized to transact business in this
state or has income attributable to this state. The tax rate imposed by this
section shall be as follows:
(a) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2001, the
tax imposed by this section shall be equal to seven and six-tenths per-
cent (7.6%) of Idaho taxable income.
(b) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2012, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to seven and
four-tenths percent (7.4%) of Idaho taxable income.
(c) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2018, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six and nine
hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (6.925%) of Idaho taxable in-
come.
(d) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2021,
the tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six and
five-tenths percent (6.5%) of Idaho taxable income.
(e) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2022, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six percent
(6%) of Idaho taxable income.
(f) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2023, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
eight-tenths percent (5.8%) of Idaho taxable income.
(g) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2024, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and six
hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (5.695%) of Idaho taxable in-
come.
(h) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2025, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
three-tenths percent (5.3%) of Idaho taxable income.


(2) In the case of an S corporation that is required to file a return un-
der section 63-3030, Idaho Code, a tax is hereby imposed at the rate provided
in subsection (1) of this section upon both:
(a) Net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state. The
amount of net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state shall
be computed in accordance with section 1374 of the Internal Revenue
Code subject to the apportionment and allocation provisions of section
63-3027, Idaho Code; and
(b) Excess net passive income attributable to this state. The amount of
excess net passive income attributable to this state shall be computed
in accordance with section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to
the apportionment and allocation provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho
Code.
(3) The tax imposed by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not be
less than twenty dollars ($20.00); provided that the twenty-dollar ($20.00)
minimum payment shall not be collected from nonproductive mining corpora-
tions.
(4) The tax imposed by this section shall not apply to corporations
taxed pursuant to the provisions of section 63-3025A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 63-3025, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 30, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3025, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3025. TAX ON CORPORATE INCOME. (1) For each taxable year, a tax is
hereby imposed on the Idaho taxable income of a corporation, other than an
S corporation, that transacts or is authorized to transact business in this
state or has income attributable to this state. The tax rate imposed by this
section shall be as follows:
(a) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2001, the
tax imposed by this section shall be equal to seven and six-tenths per-
cent (7.6%) of Idaho taxable income.
(b) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2012, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to seven and
four-tenths percent (7.4%) of Idaho taxable income.
(c) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2018, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six and nine
hundred twenty-five thousandths percent (6.925%) of Idaho taxable in-
come.
(d) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2021,
the tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six and
five-tenths percent (6.5%) of Idaho taxable income.
(e) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2022, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to six percent
(6%) of Idaho taxable income.
(f) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2023, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
eight-tenths percent (5.8%) of Idaho taxable income.


(g) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2024, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and six
hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (5.695%) of Idaho taxable in-
come.
(h) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2025, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
three-tenths percent (5.3%) of Idaho taxable income.
(i) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2027, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and six
hundred ninety-five thousandths percent (5.695%) of Idaho taxable in-
come.
(j) For each taxable year, commencing on and after January 1, 2028, the
tax imposed by this section is changed and shall be equal to five and
three-tenths percent (5.3%) of Idaho taxable income.
(2) In the case of an S corporation that is required to file a return un-
der section 63-3030, Idaho Code, a tax is hereby imposed at the rate provided
in subsection (1) of this section on both:
(a) Net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state. The
amount of net recognized built-in gain attributable to this state shall
be computed in accordance with section 1374 of the Internal Revenue
Code subject to the apportionment and allocation provisions of section
63-3027, Idaho Code; and
(b) Excess net passive income attributable to this state. The amount of
excess net passive income attributable to this state shall be computed
in accordance with section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to
the apportionment and allocation provisions of section 63-3027, Idaho
Code.
(3) The tax imposed by subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not be
less than twenty dollars ($20.00); provided that the twenty-dollar ($20.00)
minimum payment shall not be collected from nonproductive mining corpora-
tions.
(4) The tax imposed by this section shall not apply to corporations
taxed pursuant to the provisions of section 63-3025A, Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 and 4 of this act shall be in full force on and af-
ter January 1, 2027, and Sections 2, 3, 5, and 6 of this act shall be in full
force and effect on and after January 1, 2028.